Utah statutes.
73-18-20.6.   Report by owners or lienholders of thefts and recoveries.

(1)  The owner, or person having a lien or encumbrance upon a registered vessel or outboard motor which has been stolen or embezzled, may notify the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the theft or embezzlement occurred.  If a vessel or outboard motor was embezzled, a report may be made only after having procured the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the person charged with embezzlement.

(2)  Any person who has given any notice under Subsection (1) shall notify the law enforcement agency where the theft or embezzlement was reported of a recovery of the vessel or outboard motor.

